Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1906
Director of Agriculture; rules and regulations; adopt; requirements.

The director shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as are necessary to the proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law. Such rules and regulations shall require:

(1) Antemortem and postmortem inspection, quarantine, segregation, sanitation standards and reinspections with respect to the slaughter of livestock and poultry and the preparation of livestock products and poultry products at all establishments licensed in this state, except those exempted by subdivision (9) of section 54-1908, rendering establishments and pet feed manufacturing establishments;

(2) The identification of livestock and poultry for inspection purposes and the marking and labeling of livestock products or poultry products or their containers, or both, to clearly identify the products as inspected and passed if inspected and passed, or not for sale if not inspected, or condemned if they are found upon inspection to be adulterated. Condemned products shall be decharacterized or denatured or destroyed and shall not be sold or offered for sale as human food;

(3) Prohibition of entry into official establishments of livestock products and poultry products not prepared under federal inspection, or inspection pursuant to the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law, and further limit the entry of such articles and other materials into such establishments under such conditions as he or she deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law;

(4) That when a livestock product, meat food product, poultry product, or poultry food product leaves an official establishment it shall conform to the requirements of the Nebraska Pure Food Act;

(5) Prior approval of all labeling and containers to be used for such products when sold or transported in intrastate commerce to assure that they comply with the requirements of the Nebraska Pure Food Act;

(6) That necessary facilities, equipment, identification practices, sanitary standards, inspections of materials and ingredients be used in the preparation of products at a rendering establishment or a pet feed establishment for the protection of the health and welfare of the citizens of this state and their pets, livestock, and poultry. Inspections as described in this subdivision shall be at the expense of the establishment operator receiving the service;

(7) That the conveyance or conveyances used by pet feed manufacturers, renderers, and motor carriers are so constructed as to be leak proof, insect tight, readily cleaned, and disinfected and kept in a sanitary condition;

(8) That any mobile or remote processing unit used by renderers be kept in sanitary condition, transported, and utilized in a manner as determined prudent by the department to minimize the risk of the spread of disease;

(9) That the products of hydrolyzed whole poultry processing be processed in such a manner as to be suitable for animal food, including heating by boiling at two hundred twelve degrees Fahrenheit at sea level for thirty minutes, dry extrusion at a minimum temperature of two hundred eighty-four degrees Fahrenheit for thirty seconds with a pressure differential of approximately forty atmospheres as the product exits the extruder, or their equivalents as approved by the department unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the department that heating is not required to render the product suitable for animal food; and

(10) Inspection of all operations traditionally and usually conducted at retail stores where meat, meat food products, poultry, and poultry food products are sold, consumed, held for sale or offered for sale, and in connection therewith, to cause such operations to be inspected to protect the consuming public from meat, poultry, meat food products, and poultry food products which may be adulterated or misbranded by seizure or embargo of such products pursuant to the terms of section 54-1912.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 6, p. 1508;

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 43;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 13.

Nebraska Pure Food Act, see section 81-2,239.